District of Columbia statutes.
1-207.34

Assistance of the United States Civil Service Commission in development of District merit system.

The United States Civil Service Commission is hereby authorized to advise and assist the Mayor and the Council in the further development of the merit system or systems required by § 1-204.22(3) and the said Commission is authorized to enter into agreements with the District government to make available its registers of eligibles as a recruiting source to fill District positions as needed. The costs of any specific services furnished by the Civil Service Commission may be compensated for under the provisions of § 1-207.31.

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 823, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 734
1981 Ed., § 1-515.
1973 Ed., § 1-322.

“§ 1-1131 (§ 1-207.31, 2001 Ed.)”, referred to at the end of the last sentence of this section, was repealed by § 5(b) of the Act of September 13, 1982, Pub. L. 97-258.

Present provisions similar to repealed § 1-207.31 are codified at 31 U.S.C.§ 1537.

Definitions applicable: The definitions contained in § 1-201.03 apply to this section.